Utah statutes.
16-10a-706.   Waiver of notice.
(1)  A shareholder may waive any notice required by this chapter, the articles
of incorporation, or the bylaws before or after the date and time stated in
the notice as the date or time when any action will occur or has occurred.
The waiver must be in writing, be signed by the shareholder entitled to the
notice, and be delivered to the corporation for inclusion in the minutes or
filing with the corporate records.
(2)  A shareholder's attendance at a meeting:
(a)  waives objection to lack of notice or defective notice of the meeting,
unless the shareholder at the beginning of the meeting objects to holding the
meeting or transacting business at the meeting because of lack of notice or
defective notice; and
(b)  waives objection to consideration of a particular matter at the meeting
that is not within the purposes described in the meeting notice, unless the
shareholder objects to considering the matter when it is presented.
